Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3980
Flavor and odor of acceptable raw milk for manufacturing purposes.

The odor of acceptable raw milk for manufacturing purposes shall be fresh and sweet. The milk shall be free from objectionable feed and other off-odors that would adversely affect the finished product, and it shall not show any abnormal condition, including, but not limited to, curdled, ropy, bloody, or mastitic condition, as indicated by sight or odor.

Laws 1969, c. 5, § 5, p. 72;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-263.91;

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 2-3916;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 16.